South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3618.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 12-36-2120 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (85) baby formula and baby food, which includes but is not limited to food purees, puffs, teether crackers, puree pouches, and other food intended for sale for children under thirty-six months of age; (86) diapers for babies and children. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----